North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-29.2 Unconventional Vehicles

39-29.2-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Identifying number” means the vehicle identification numbers and letters if any assigned by the manufacturer or by the department for the purpose of identifying a vehicle. The term includes any numbers or letters assigned by the manufacturer for the purpose of identifying a part of a vehicle or any number placed on a part in accordance with this chapter or rules of the department for the purpose of identifying the vehicle.

“Unconventional vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is designed to travel on at least three wheels in contact with the ground, has an unladen weight of at least three hundred pounds [136.08 kilograms] but less than eight thousand pounds [3628.7 kilograms], has a permanent upright seat that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride it, has a steering device for front wheel steering control, is capable of speeds in excess of sixty-five miles [104.61 kilometers] per hour, complies with equipment listed in chapter 39-21 or 39-27, as appropriate, and has an identifying number. The term does not include motor vehicles that otherwise may be registered under this title.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 345, § 3; 2015, ch. 276, § 5, effective April 20, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 12 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015.

39-29.2-02.
Certificate of title for unconventional vehicle.

The department shall issue a certificate of title for an unconventional vehicle in accordance with section 39-05-05.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 345, § 3.

39-29.2-03.
Registration of unconventional vehicle.

Registration of an unconventional vehicle is governed by this chapter.

An individual may not operate an unconventional vehicle on public roadways unless the vehicle has been registered under this chapter.

The department shall design and furnish an application that must be used to register an unconventional vehicle. The registration must state the name and address of every owner of the unconventional vehicle and must be signed by at least one owner. A copy of the application is evidence of registration for the first thirty days after the date of application.

On receipt of an application and the appropriate fee, the department shall register an unconventional vehicle and assign a registration number plate and a certificate of registration. The certificate of registration must include information regarding the make, year, identifying number, and name and address of the owner.

The fee for registration of an unconventional vehicle is fifty dollars per year. For a duplicate or replacement registration number or registration card that is lost, mutilated, or becomes illegible, the department may charge a fee of not more than five dollars.

To renew a registration, the owner of an unconventional vehicle shall follow the procedure adopted by the department and pay the registration fee.

The department shall issue a plate in the same manner as a plate is issued to a motorcycle. Whenever the ownership of an unconventional vehicle registered under this chapter is transferred or assigned, the plates must be handled in accordance with subsection 1 of section 39-04-36.

Funds collected from registration must be deposited in the motor vehicle registration fund.

Every unconventional vehicle is subject to the motor vehicle body damage disclosure requirement of section 39-05-17.2.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 345, § 3; 2015, ch. 276, §§ 6–8, effective April 20, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by sections 6-8 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 12 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015.

Note.

Section 39-29.2-03 was amended 3 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 276, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2312; Section 7 of Chapter 276, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2312; Section 8 of Chapter 276, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2312.

39-29.2-04.
Operation of unconventional vehicle.

To operate an unconventional vehicle on a highway, the operator must be a class D licensed driver. An operator may operate an unconventional vehicle on any highway.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 345, § 3; 2015, ch. 276, § 9, effective April 20, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 12 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015.

39-29.2-05.
Equipment.

Operators and passengers in an unconventional vehicle shall comply with seatbelt use laws.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 276, § 10, effective April 20, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 12 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015.

39-29.2-06.
Manufacturer’s or distributor’s certification.

The manufacturer or distributor shall certify that an unconventional vehicle is designed and manufactured for use upon public highways and complies with the rules adopted under this chapter. An individual who manufactures an unconventional vehicle for personal use does not have to meet the certification requirements of this section, but shall comply with the rules adopted under this chapter.

The certificate must be incorporated on the manufacturer’s statement of origin upon transfer of vehicle ownership.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 276, § 11, effective April 20, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 12 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015.